Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7690.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 40-5.2-35 of the General Laws in Chapter 40-5.2 entitled "The Rhode
Island Works Program" is hereby amended to read as follows:
40-5.2-35. Child support pass-through.
For any month in which a noncustodial parent makes a child support payment in the month
when due and the support is collected by the department of human services, for a child or children
receiving cash assistance pursuant to this chapter, the first fifty dollars ($50.00) one hundred dollars
($100) for one child or the first two hundred dollars ($200) for more than one child of the child
support payment, or the actual amount of the child support payment if the payment is less than fifty
dollars ($50.00) one hundred dollars ($100) for one child or two hundred dollars ($200) for more
than one child, shall be paid to the family in which the child resides. If more than one noncustodial
parent makes a child support payment to children living in the same family, there shall only be one
payment of fifty dollars ($50.00) one hundred dollars ($100) for one child or two hundred dollars
($200) for more than one child paid to the family from the child support collected. This payment is
known as the “pass through” payment and shall be sent to the family within two (2) business days
of the determination that the amount is due and owing and no later than within two (2) business
days of the end of the month in which the support was collected.

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
========
LC004700
========
LC004700 - Page 2 of 3